Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-114
National Guard; annual encampment; attendance.

The Nebraska National Guard shall encamp for instruction not less than fifteen days annually at such time, place, or places as may be ordered by the Governor. No member of the Nebraska National Guard will be excused from attendance except upon an order of the Adjutant General.

Laws 1909, c. 90, § 40, p. 379;

R.S.1913, § 3940;

C.S.1922, § 3340;

C.S.1929, § 55-167;

R.S.1943, § 55-154;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 24, p. 601;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-154;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 12, p. 1585.

Carpenter employed by Nebraska National Guard in preparation for encampment was employee of state governmental agency under workmen's compensation law, when injured in course of employment. Nebraska National Guard v. Morgan, 112 Neb. 432, 199 N.W. 557 (1924).